Washington statutes.
RCW 11.84.020

Slayer or abuser not to benefit from death.

No slayer or abuser shall in any way acquire any property or receive any benefit as the result of the death of the decedent, but such property shall pass as provided in the sections following.

[ 2009 c 525 s 2; 1965 c 145 s 11.84.020. Prior: 1955 c 141 s 2.]